Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-112
Mayor; recommendations to city council.

The mayor shall, from time to time, communicate to the city council such information and recommend such measures as, in his opinion, may tend to the improvement of the finances, the police, health, security, ornament, comfort, and general prosperity of the city.

Laws 1879, § 12, p. 196;

R.S.1913, § 5004;

C.S.1922, § 4173;

C.S.1929, § 17-112;

R.S.1943, § 17-112.

Statements of mayor as to qualification and integrity of an employee of city are privileged if made in good faith. Greenwood v. Cobbey, 26 Neb. 449, 42 N.W. 413 (1889).